Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4442.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 14b. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapters 408 to 420 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 408.1035(5) Person H MIOSHA violation causing employee death 1 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Person G MIOSHA violation causing employee death ? subsequent offense 3 408.1035a(5) Person H MIOSHA violation causing employee death 1 Person G MIOSHA violation causing employee death ? subsequent offense 3 409.122(2) 409.122(1)(b) Person G Employment of children during certain hours ? second offense 2 409.122(1)(c) Person E Employment of children during certain hours ? third or subsequent offense 105 409.122(3) 409.122(2) Person D Employment of children in child sexually abusive activity 20 409.122(3)(a) Person E Employment of children during certain hours involving death or great bodily harm ? first offense 5 409.122(3)(b) Person D Employment of children during certain hours involving death or great bodily harm ? second offense 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 409.122(3)(c) Person B Employment of children during certain hours involving death or great bodily harm ? third or subsequent offense 20 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01071'25) or House Bill No. 4441 (request no. H01071'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.